pt-PT: Características do item de limpeza de veículos: Sem amoníaco; Durável; Alto brilho; Melhor eficiência de combustível; Sem listras; Emissões reduzidas; Restaura o desempenho; Seguro para vidros escuros; Resistente a UV; Repelente de água; Outro
pl: Charakterystyka przedmiotów do czyszczenia pojazdów: Bez amoniaku; Trwały efekt; Wysoki połysk; Lepsza oszczędność paliwa; Niekolidujący; Zmniejszający emisję spalin; Przywraca wydajność; Bezpieczny dla przyciemnianych szyb; Odporne na promieniowanie UV; Wodoodporne; Inne
fi: Ajoneuvojen puhdistuskohteen ominaisuudet: Ammoniakiton; Kestävä; Erittäin kiiltävä; Parempi polttoainetehokkuus; Ei-raidoittuva; Vähentyneet päästöt; Palauttaa suorituskyvyn; Turvallinen tummennetuille ikkunoille; UV-kestävä; Vettä hylkivä; Muu
ru: Характеристики средства для мойки автомобиля: Без аммиака; Прочный; Высокий глянец; Улучшенная экономия топлива; Не оставляет разводов; Сокращение выбросов; Восстанавливает производительность; Безопасно для тонированных окон; Устойчив к УФ-излучению; Водоотталкивающий; Другое
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ειδών καθαρισμού οχήματος: Χωρίς αμμωνία; Ανθεκτικό; Έντονη λάμψη; Βελτιωμένη απόδοση καυσίμου; Μη ραβδώσεις; Μειωμένες εκπομπές; Επαναφέρει την απόδοση; Ασφαλές για φιμέ τζάμια; Ανθεκτικό στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία; Υδατοαπωθητικό; Άλλο
nl: Kenmerken voertuigreinigingsartikel: Ammoniakvrij; Duurzaam; Hoogglans; Verbeterde brandstofefficiëntie; Streept niet; Verminderde uitstoot; Herstelt de prestaties; Veilig voor getinte ramen; UV-werend; Waterafstotend; Andere
sv: Detaljer för fordonsrengöring: Ammoniakfri; Hållbar; Högglans; Förbättrad bränsleeffektivitet; Icke-strimmig; Minskade utsläpp; Återställer prestanda; Säkert för tonade fönster; UV-beständig; Vattenavvisande; Övrigt
ko: 차량 청소용품 기능: 무암모니아; 튼튼한; 고광택; 연료 효율성 향상; 비연속성; 배출 감소; 성능 복원; 착색된 창문 사용 가능; UV 차단; 발수제; 기타
fr: Caractéristiques de l’article de nettoyage de véhicule: Sans ammoniaque; Durable; Haute brillance; Efficacité énergétique améliorée; Ne laisse pas de traces; Émissions réduites; Rétablit la performance; Sans danger pour les vitres teintées; Résistant aux UV; Hydrofuge; Autre
bg-BG: Характеристики на елемента за почистване на превозни средства: Без амоняк; Издръжлив; Силен гланц; Подобрена горивна ефективност; Без да оставя следи; Намалени емисии; Възстановява ефективността; Безопасен за затъмнени стъкла; Устойчив на UV лъчи; Водоотблъскващ; Други
tr: Araç temizleme öğesi özellikleri: Amonyak içermez; Dayanıklı; Yüksek parlaklık; Artırılmış yakıt verimliliği; İz bırakmaz; Azaltılmış emisyon; Performans yenilemesi; Renklendirilmiş pencereler için güvenli; UV ışınlarına dayanıklı; Su itici; Diğer
en: Vehicle cleaning item features: Ammonia-free; Durable; High gloss; Improved fuel efficiency; Non-streaking; Reduced emissions; Restores performance; Safe for tinted windows; UV resistant; Water repellent; Other
ja: 車両クリーニングアイテムの機能: アンモニアフリー; 耐久性に優れた; 高光沢; 燃費向上; 傷なし; 排出量削減; パフォーマンス回復; 着色ガラス窓にも安全; 耐UV; 撥水加工; その他
zh-CN: 车辆清洁物品特点: 不含氨; 耐用; 高光泽; 提高燃油效率; 不挂水; 减少排放; 恢复性能; 适用于有色窗户; 抗紫外线; 防水; 其他
es: Características del artículo de limpieza de vehículos: Sin amoníaco; Duradero; Alto brillo; Mayor eficiencia de combustible; Antimanchas; Emisiones reducidas; Restaura el rendimiento; Seguro para cristales tintados; Resistente a los rayos UV; Repelente al agua; Otros
sl-SI: Lastnosti predmetov za čiščenje vozil: Brez amonijaka; Trpežnost; Visok sijaj; Izboljšan izkoristek goriva; Brez prog; Zmanjšane emisije; Obnavlja zmogljivost; Varno za zatemnjena stekla; UV odporen; Vodoodbojen; Drugo
lt-LT: Transporto priemonių valymo prekių savybės: Be amoniako; Patvarūs; Itin blizgi; Didesnis kuro suvartojimo efektyvumas; Be dryžių; Mažesnė emisija; Atkuria našumą; Saugi tamsintiems langams; Atspari UV spinduliams; Vandens repelentas; Kita
hr-HR: Značajke proizvoda za čišćenje vozila: Bez amonijaka; Izdržljivo; Visoki sjaj; Poboljšana učinkovitost goriva; Bez pruga; Smanjene emisije; Vraća performanse; Sigurno za zatamnjena stakla; Otporno na UV zračenje; Vodoodbojno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Caracteristicile articolelor pentru curățarea vehiculului: Fără amoniac; Durabil; Luciu ridicat; Eficiență îmbunătățită a carburantului; Fără dungi; Emisii reduse; Restabilește performanța; Sigur pentru geamurile fumurii; Rezistență la UV; Hidrofug; Altele
it: Funzionalità degli articoli per la pulizia del veicolo: Senza ammoniaca; Durevole; Molto lucido; Migliore efficienza dei consumi; Senza striature; Emissioni ridotte; Ripristino prestazioni; Sicuro per vetri oscurati; Resistente ai raggi UV; Idrorepellente; Altro
zh-TW: 汽機車清潔用品特點: 無氨; 耐用; 高光澤; 提高燃油效率; 無水漬; 減少排放; 恢復效能; 適用於隔熱膜; 抗紫外線; 抗水; 其他
de: Eigenschaften der Fahrzeugreinigungsartikel: Ammoniakfrei; Langlebig; Hochglanz; Verbesserte Kraftstoffeffizienz; Keine Streifenbildung; Reduzierte Emissionen; Stellt die Leistung wieder her; Sicher für getönte Scheiben; UV-beständig; Wasserabweisend; Sonstiges
th: คุณลักษณะของอุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดยานรถยนต์: ปราศจากแอมโมเนีย; ทนทาน; มีความมันวาวสูง; การใช้เชื้อเพลิงประสิทธิภาพดีขึ้น; ไม่เป็นเส้น; ลดการปล่อยมลพิษ; คืนประสิทธิภาพ; ใช้กับฟิลม์กระจกได้; ทนรังสียูวี; กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
nb: Funksjoner for rengjøring av kjøretøy: Ammoniakkfri; Slitesterk; Høyglans; Forbedret drivstoffeffektivitet; Ingen striper; Reduserte utslipp; Gjenoppretter ytelsen; Trygg for tonede vinduer; UV-bestandig; Vannavstøtende; Annet
pt-BR: Recursos do item de limpeza de veículos: Sem amônia; Durável; Alto brilho; Melhor eficiência de combustível; Não cria estriamento; Emissões reduzidas; Restaura o desempenho; Seguro para vidros escuros; Resistente aos raios ultravioleta; Repelente de água; Outro
cs: Vlastnosti předmětu na čištění vozidel: Bez amoniaku; Odolné; Vysoký lesk; Vylepšená palivová účinnost; Nerozbitné; Snížené emise; Obnovení výkonu; Bezpečné pro tónovaná okna; Odolné proti UV záření; Odpuzovač vody; Jiné
da: Funktioner for artikler til rengøring af køretøjer: Ammoniakfri; Holdbar; Højglans; Forbedret brændstofeffektivitet; Ikke-stribende; Reducerede emissioner; Gendanner ydeevnen; Sikker til tonede ruder; UV-bestandig; Vandafvisende; Andet
sk-SK: Vlastnosti položky na čistenie vozidiel: Bez amoniaku; Odolný; Vysoký lesk; Vylepšená palivová účinnosť; Bez pruhov; Znížené emisie; Obnovuje výkon; Bezpečné pre tónované okná; Odolný voči UV žiareniu; Vodoodpudivý; Iné
hu: Autóápolási termék jellemzői: Ammóniamentes; Tartós; Magas fényű; Javított üzemanyag-hatékonyság; Csíkmentes; Csökkentett kibocsátás; Visszaállítja a teljesítményt; Biztonságos a sötétített ablakokhoz; UV-álló; Víztaszító; Egyéb
vi: Tính năng sản phẩm vệ sinh xe: Không chứa amoniac; Bền; Độ bóng cao; Cải thiện hiệu quả sử dụng nhiên liệu; Không để lại vệt; Giảm khí thải; Khôi phục hiệu suất; An toàn cho cửa sổ màu; Chống tia UV; Không thấm nước; Khác